Massachusetts, session 194th, S1800.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 7 (c) (ii) of chapter 372 of the Acts of 1984 of the General Laws shall be
amended by striking out the words "provided that any collective bargaining agreement may
protect employees against such actions on arbitrary, capricious or unreasonable grounds," and
inserting in their place the words, "for just cause."
of 1